Utah statutes.
75-8-101.   Time of taking effect -- Provisions for transition.
(1) This code takes effect on July 1, 1977.
(2)  Except as provided elsewhere in this code, on the effective date of this
code:
(a)  This code applies to any wills of decedents dying thereafter.
(b)  The code applies to any proceedings in court then pending or thereafter
commenced regardless of the time of the death of decedent except to the extent
that in the opinion of the court the former procedure should be made
applicable in a particular case in the interest of justice or because of
infeasibility of application of the procedure of this code.
(c)  Every personal representative including a person administering an estate
of a minor or incompetent holding an appointment on that date, continues to
hold the appointment but has only the powers conferred by this code and is
subject to the duties imposed with respect to any act occurring or done
thereafter.
(d)  An act done before the effective date in any proceeding and any accrued
right is not impaired by this code. If a right is acquired, extinguished or
barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period of time which has commenced
to run by the provisions of any statute before the effective date, the
provisions shall remain in force with respect to that right.
(e)  Any rule of construction or presumption provided in this code applies to
instruments executed and multiple-party accounts opened before the effective
date unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent.
